Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1537
Employer; prohibited acts; penalty.

Any person who (1) coerces or attempts to coerce any of his or her employees in their voting or in any other political action at any caucus, convention, or election held or to be held in this state or (2) attempts to influence the political action of his or her employees by threatening to discharge them because of their political action or by threats on the part of such person to close his or her place of business in the event of the passage or defeat of any issue on the ballot, in the event of the election or defeat of any candidate for public office, or in the event of the success or defeat of any political party at any election shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 436.